Vermont, session 2025-2026, H746.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to simplify the design and installation
requirements for public and private water supplies and for public and private
wastewater systems in order to reduce the cost of housing and other
development while also maintaining essential protections for human health and
the environment.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1971 is amended to read:
§ 1971. PURPOSE
It is the purpose of this chapter to:
(1) establish a comprehensive program to regulate the construction,
replacement, modification, and operation of potable water supplies and
wastewater systems in the State in order to protect encourage construction of
housing and foster economic development while also protecting human health
and the environment, including potable water supplies, surface water, and
groundwater;
(2) eliminate duplicative or unnecessary permitting requirements
through the consolidation of existing authorities and, where appropriate, the
use of permits by rule;
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 4 of 16
(3) allow the use of alternative, innovative, and experimental
technologies for the treatment and disposal of wastewater in the appropriate
circumstances;
(4) protect the investment of homeowners through a flexible remediation
process for failed potable water supplies and wastewater systems;
(5) increase reliance on and the accountability of the private sector for
the design and installation of potable water supplies and wastewater systems,
through licensing and enforcement; and
(6) allow delegation of the permitting program created by this chapter to
municipalities demonstrating the capacity to administer the chapter.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 1973 is amended to read:
§ 1973. PERMITS
(a) Except as provided in this section and sections 1974 and 1978 of this
title, a person shall obtain a permit from the Secretary before:
(1) subdividing land;
(2) creating or modifying a campground in a manner that affects a
potable water supply or wastewater system or the requirements for providing
potable water and wastewater disposal;
(3) constructing, replacing, or modifying a potable water supply or
wastewater system;
(4) using or operating a failed supply or failed system;
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 5 of 16
(5) constructing a new building or structure;
(6) modifying an existing building or structure in a manner that
increases the design flow or modifies other operational requirements of a
potable water supply or wastewater system, provided that when the use of an
existing, permitted potable water supply used for a public benefit, such as a
school, child or elder care, or government use, is altered for use for another
public benefit with a similar number of users, the Secretary shall not require
redesign of the supply or require additional capacity for the supply;
(7) making a new or modified connection to a new or existing potable
water supply or wastewater system; or
(8) changing the use of a building or structure in a manner that increases
the design flows or modifies other operational requirements of a potable water
supply or wastewater system.
* * *
(f)(1) The Secretary shall give deference to a certification by a licensed
designer with respect to the engineering design or judgment exercised by the
designer in order to minimize Agency review of certified designs. Nothing in
this section shall limit the responsibility of the licensed designer to comply
with all standards and rules, or the authority of the Secretary to review and
comment on design aspects of an application or to enforce Agency rules with
respect to the design or the design certification. This section shall allow the
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 6 of 16
Secretary to issue a permit under this chapter based on the certification by a
licensed designer of record drawings or the design of a wastewater system or
potable water supply without individual review of each certification by the
Secretary.
(2) The Secretary shall issue a permit for a new or modified connection
to a water main and a sewer main or indirect discharge system from a building
or structure in a designated downtown development district upon submission
of an application under subsection (b) of this section that consists solely of the
certification of a licensed designer, in accordance with subsection (d) of this
section, and a letter from the owner of the water main and sewer main or
indirect discharge system allocating the capacity needed to accommodate the
new or modified connection. However, this subdivision (2) shall not apply if
the Secretary finds one of the following:
(A) The Secretary has prohibited the system that submitted the
allocation letter from issuing new allocation letters due to a lack of capacity.
(B) As a result of an audit of the application performed on a random
basis or in response to a complaint, the system is not designed in accordance
with the rules adopted under this chapter.
(3) When the Secretary issues a permit for a new or modified connection
to an existing permitted indirect discharge system, the approval of the
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 7 of 16
connection shall not require reissuance, reevaluation, or modification of the
existing permitted indirect discharge system permit.
* * *
(k) When issuing a permit for an indirect discharge system, the Secretary
shall require an easement or other permanent legal access only to the indirect
discharge system and the disposal area. An easement or other permanent legal
access shall not be required prior to issuance of the permit for every potential
service connection from a building or structure to the indirect discharge
system.
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 1978 is amended to read:
§ 1978. RULES
(a) The Secretary shall adopt rules, in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25,
necessary for the administration of this chapter. These rules shall include the
following:
(1) Performance standards for wastewater systems, including standards
for the maximum application rates for the sizing of a leachfield for a
wastewater system based on soil texture and soil structure.
(2) Design flow standards for potable water supplies and wastewater
systems, including:
(A) design standards for the construction of wastewater systems
underneath land used for parking, car parks, or other similar paved surfaces;
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 8 of 16
(B) design flows specific to systems serving compact housing, small
homes, or community systems serving small homes;
(C) reduced capacity requirements for wastewater systems using
water-saving devices based on the number of living units served by the system;
and
(D) design flow requirements for community-based wastewater
systems that replace on-site wastewater systems that reflect the actual flow for
living units served.
(3) Design requirements, including isolation distances, provided that for
wastewater systems that include a leachfield in a mound, the rules shall allow
any fill material that meets ASTM International specification C-33 or type 2
soil standards.
(4) Monitoring and reporting requirements.
(5) Soils and hydrogeologic requirements.
(6) Operation and maintenance requirements appropriate to the
complexity of the system.
* * *
(16) Performance standards, design requirements, and design flow
standards for compact wastewater systems that use advanced filtration
technologies, such as aerobic treatment units, biofilters, compact leachfields, or
drip irrigation. Any standards adopted for compact wastewater systems shall
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 9 of 16
allow for importation of materials into the State for the design and installation
of the compact wastewater system.
(b) The Secretary may, by rule, establish permitting exemptions upon a
determination that those exemptions are consistent with the purposes of this
chapter, and are necessary for the appropriate implementation of this chapter.
(c) The Secretary shall first adopt rules under this section no later than July
30, 2002. [Repealed.]
(d) The Secretary shall not adopt rules under this chapter that allow
wastewater systems that serve lots created after June 13, 2002, to be
constructed on ground with a maximum slope in excess of 20 percent. This
limitation shall not apply to replacement wastewater systems.
(e)(1) The Secretary shall periodically review and, if necessary, revise the
rules adopted under this chapter to ensure that the technical standards remain
current with the known and proven technologies regarding potable water
supplies and wastewater systems.
(2) The Secretary shall seek advice from a Technical Advisory
Committee in carrying out the mandate of this subdivision. The Governor
shall appoint the members of the Committee and ensure that there is at least
one representative of the following entities on the Committee: professional
engineers, site technicians, well drillers, hydrogeologists, town officials with
jurisdiction over potable water supplies and wastewater systems, water quality
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 10 of 16
specialists, technical staff of the Agency of Natural Resources, and technical
staff of the Department of Health. Administrative support for the Advisory
Committee shall be provided by the Secretary of Natural Resources.
(3) The Technical Advisory Committee shall provide annual reports,
starting on January 15, 2003, to the Chairs of the House Committee on
Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Institutions. The
reports shall include information on the following topics: the implementation
of this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter; the number and type of
alternative or innovative systems approved for general use, approved for use as
a pilot project, and approved for experimental use; the functional status of
alternative or innovative systems approved for use as a pilot project or
approved for experimental use; the number of permit applications received
during the preceding calendar year; the number of permits issued during the
preceding calendar year; and the number of permit applications denied during
the preceding calendar year, together with a summary of the basis of denial.
* * *
(f) The Secretary may adopt emergency rules as necessary to assure that the
implementation of this chapter does not have an undue adverse effect upon the
marketability of title to real estate.
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 11 of 16
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 1983 is added to read:
§ 1983. ISOLATION DISTANCES
(a) The minimum horizontal isolation distance between all components of a
wastewater system and a potable water supply, including a public water source,
shall be 75 feet unless, based on the specific site conditions, the Secretary
determines that a greater isolation distance or larger isolation zone is necessary
to:
(1) prevent the potential subsurface flow of effluent from impacting a
potable water supply;
(2) prevent the potable water supply from impacting the performance of
a wastewater system; or
(3) protect human health and the environment from a threat or potential
threat of contamination posed by the construction techniques or materials used
in the wastewater system or the potable water supply.
(b) The maximum horizontal isolation distance or isolation zone that the
Secretary can approve under subsection (a) of this section is 200 feet.
Sec. 6. TRANSITION; IMPLEMENTATION; EFFECTIVE DATE
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall consult with the Technical
Advisory Committee regarding the rulemaking required under 10 V.S.A.
§ 1978 in Sec. 4 of this act on or before October 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 12 of 16
(b) On or before January 1, 2028, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
amend the Department of Environmental Conservation’s Wastewater System
and Potable Water Supply Rules in order to ensure consistency with the
requirements of this act, including the required rulemaking under 10 V.S.A.
§ 1978.
(c) Potable water supply and wastewater system permits shall be issued
under the Department of Environmental Conservation’s current Wastewater
System and Potable Water Supply Rules until the rules are amended for
consistency with the requirements of this act or until July 1, 2027, whichever
occurs first.
Sec. 7. 10 V.S.A. § 913 is amended to read:
§ 913. PROHIBITION
(a) Except for allowed uses adopted by the Department by rule, no person
shall conduct or allow to be conducted an activity in a significant wetland or
buffer zone of a significant wetland except in compliance with a permit,
conditional use determination, or order issued by the Secretary.
(b) A permit shall not be required under this section for:
(1) any activity that occurred before the effective date of this section
unless the activity occurred within:
(A) an area identified as a wetland on the Vermont significant
wetlands inventory maps;
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 13 of 16
(B) a wetland that was contiguous to an area identified as a wetland
on the Vermont significant wetlands inventory maps; or
(C) the buffer zone of a wetland referred to in subdivision (A) or (B)
of this subdivision (1); and
(2) any construction within a wetland that is identified on the Vermont
significant wetlands inventory maps or within the buffer zone of such a
wetland, provided that the construction was completed prior to February 23,
1992, and no action for which a permit is required under the rules of the
Department was taken or caused to be taken on or after February 23, 1992.
(c) Notwithstanding the requirement under subsection (b) of this section for
a permit to conduct an activity in a wetland or wetland buffer zone, no permit
shall be required under this section for the siting of a leachfield in the buffer
zone of a Class II wetland when the leachfield is part of a wastewater system
permitted by the Secretary of Natural Resources under chapter 64 of this title.
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 1263(f) is amended to read:
(f)(1) Existing indirect discharges to the waters of the State from on-site
disposal of sewage shall comply with and be subject to the provisions of this
chapter, and shall obtain the required permit, no not later than July 1, 1991.
Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections 1259(d) and (e) of this title,
the Secretary shall grant a permit for an existing indirect discharge to the
waters of the State for on-site disposal of sewage unless he or she the Secretary
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 14 of 16
finds that the discharge violates the water quality standards. Existing indirect
discharges from on-site sewage disposal systems of less than 6,500 gpd
capacity shall not require a permit.
(2) Notwithstanding the requirements of chapter 170 of this title, prior to
issuing a permit under this chapter for a new indirect discharge, the Secretary
shall provide notice to the public of a draft permit and a comment period of not
more than 15 days. After the conclusion of the comment period, the Secretary
shall allow any person to request a public hearing on the draft permit for a
period of not more than 15 days.
Sec. 9. 10 V.S.A. § 6081 is amended to read:
§ 6081. PERMITS REQUIRED; EXEMPTIONS
* * *
(ee) No permit or permit amendment is required for the construction of
improvements for water or wastewater infrastructure serving a village and
downtown center.
Sec. 10. 32 V.S.A. § 3752(5) is amended to read:
(5)(A) “Development” means, for the purposes of determining whether
a land use change tax is to be assessed under section 3757 of this chapter, the
construction of any building, road, or other structure, or any mining,
excavation, or landfill activity.
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 15 of 16
(B) “Development” also means the subdivision of a parcel of land
into two or more parcels, regardless of whether a change in use actually occurs,
where one or more of the resulting parcels contains less than 25 acres each; but
if subdivision is solely the result of a transfer to one or more of a spouse, ex-
spouse in a divorce settlement, parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, niece,
nephew, or sibling of the transferor, or to the surviving spouse of any of the
foregoing, then “development” shall not apply to any portion of the newly
created parcel or parcels that qualify for enrollment and for which, within
30 days following the transfer, each transferee or transferor applies for
reenrollment in the Use Value Appraisal Program.
* * *
(G) The term “development” does not include the construction on or
development of enrolled land for the purpose of permitting a potable water
supply or wastewater system under 10 V.S.A. chapter 64 to be used for
residential housing.
Sec. 11. 32 V.S.A. § 9603 is amended to read:
§ 9603. EXEMPTIONS
The following transfers are exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter:
* * *
(29) Transfers of easements required for the permitting of a potable
water supply or wastewater system under 10 V.S.A. chapter 64.
VT LEG #386103 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.746
2026 Page 16 of 16
Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386103 v.1